Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.005

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the licensure of persons offering athletic training services to the public and to ensure standards of competence and professional conduct on the part of athletic trainers.

[ 2007 c 253 s 1.]